Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1938.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5534(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5534. Aggravated cruelty to animal.* * *(b) Grading.--[A](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a felony of the third degree.(2) A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be graded as a felony of the second degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516